California statutes. Education Code
(1) The Chancellor of the California State University or a president of a state university may, at his or her discretion, without regard to the class or teaching service area to be reduced, separate from service any student assistant, instructor for extension service, person employed on a temporary basis, or, with respect to employment in a summer session, any member of the faculty of a campus summer session. Persons described in this paragraph, if performing the same or comparable work as that performed by a probationary or permanent employee, shall be separated before any probationary or permanent employee desiring to continue in employment is laid off pursuant to the provisions of this article.

(2) Probationary employees not employed on a temporary basis, without regard to length of service.

(3) Permanent employees:

(A) If the area of layoff is in administrative or nonacademic classes, permanent administrative and nonacademic employees in the inverse order of their length of employment both in the class and in class of equal or higher rank.

(B) If the area of layoff is in class or rank positions, permanent academic employees in the inverse order of their length of employment at the campuses.

(C) If the area of layoff is in the closely related academic area, permanent employees in the inverse order of their length of employment in the class or in classes of equal or higher level at the campuses.

(b) If the layoff is in a class, part-time employees shall be credited with the service at the campus in the proportion that the actual time employed bears to full-time employment. If the layoff is in a teaching service area, part-time permanent employees shall be credited with service as permanent employees of the campus in the proportion that the actual time served as permanent employees bears to full-time employment.

(c) In case two or more employees in the class or teaching service area are tied for a place in the order of layoff, the president or the chancellor, as appropriate to the place of employment, shall determine which of the employees shall be laid off.

(d) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

89553.

(a) After a determination has been made of the class or teaching service area to be reduced and the number of employees in such class or area to be laid off, the president or chancellor shall notify each employee to be laid off, that the employee is being laid off for lack of funds or lack of work. Such notice shall be in writing and mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the employee’s last known address, or the notice may be delivered to the employee in person who shall acknowledge receipt of the notice in writing. The notice shall specify the effective date of layoff and shall be delivered to the employee or mailed to the employee’s last known resident address at least 30 days, whenever possible, prior to the effective date of the layoff. When curricular shifts or other program changes, which can be anticipated, are to be made those who will be laid off will normally be notified at least one year in advance.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89554.

(a) An employee to be laid off may elect to accept such layoff prior to the date named in the notice of layoff. If an employee elects to accept early layoff, he should give as much notice as possible.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89555.

(a) In lieu of being laid off, an administrative or nonacademic employee may elect demotion or transfer to any class in which he has served as a permanent employee or to any vacancy for which he is qualified.

(b) In lieu of being laid off, an academic teaching employee actively employed at a campus during the academic year 1975–76 or prior thereto at such campus may elect transfer to that other teaching service area in which he or she has served longest during the preceding four years at the particular campus if both of the following conditions exist:

(1) If the employee, during the four-year period immediately preceding the date of the mailing of the layoff notice, taught at least 24 semester units or 36 quarter units in any one teaching service area other than the teaching service area in which he or she is teaching on the date of the mailing of the layoff notice provided that only such units as have accrued during the academic year 1975–76 and prior thereto may be utilized for purposes of transfer under this section.

(2) If the employee has not previously during that year elected transfer in lieu of layoff.

(c) In the event an employee elects demotion or transfer, his place for layoff purposes in the class or teaching service area to which he elects demotion or transfer shall be determined in accordance with this article.

(d) An employee electing demotion or transfer shall notify the president or chancellor in writing of his election within five calendar days after receipt of the notice of layoff.

(e) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89556.

(a) The president at each campus, and the chancellor at the office of the chancellor, shall establish and maintain reemployment lists of all permanent employees laid off for lack of funds or lack of work during the preceding five-year period. Laid-off permanent employees shall be listed by class or teaching service area corresponding to the class or teaching service area from which they were laid off.

(b) In the event there is a vacancy at a campus or at the office of the chancellor, for which there exists no reemployment list, the position may be offered to the persons in the appropriate class or teaching service area who are on mandatory reemployment lists at another campus or the office of the chancellor.

(c) A person shall deliver or cause to be delivered his acceptance of an offer with the following times:

(1) When the person resides in the city from which the offer is mailed, five days after the date the offer is received.

(2) When the person resides outside such city, seven days after the offer is received.

(3) When the offer is made by telephone or telegram, 48 hours after the offer is received. While a prudent effort shall be made to contact the person eligible for reemployment, it is his responsibility to keep the office maintaining the reemployment list informed of where he may be reached readily.

(d) Any person on a reemployment list who cannot be reached within five days, or who fails to reply to an offer of reemployment as required by this section, shall be deemed to have declined the offer. Such failure by any person may be excused by the president or chancellor at his discretion. If the failure is excused, the person may be reemployed or his name may be continued on the reemployment list if the vacancy has already been filled.

(e) Any person on a reemployment list may request inactive status for a prescribed period of not to exceed one year.

(f) Any person on the reemployment list who declines two offers of reemployment shall be removed from the list. Any person removed from a reemployment list may be restored to his relative position on the list at the discretion of the president or chancellor upon a showing of good cause.

(g) Any employee reemployed pursuant to this article shall be reemployed in a class at a level at least equal to that from which he was laid off.

(h) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89557.

The trustees shall adopt appropriate rules and guidelines relating to the implementation of the Reduced Worktime Act in Article 1.6 (commencing with Section 19996.20) of Chapter 7 of Part 2.6 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for employees of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1040, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California State University Police [89560. - 89562.]

89560.

The trustees may appoint one or more persons to constitute a police department for the headquarters and for each campus of the California State University. Persons employed and compensated as members of a California State University police department, when so appointed and duly sworn, are peace officers. However, such peace officers shall not exercise their powers or authority except (a) at the headquarters or upon any campus of the California State University and in an area within one mile of the exterior boundaries of each campus or the headquarters, and in or about other grounds or properties owned, operated, controlled, or administered by the California State University, or by trustees or the state on behalf of the California State University, and (b) as provided in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

89561.

Every member of a California State University police department shall be supplied with, and authorized to wear, a badge bearing the words “California State University Police.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

89562.

(a) On or before July 1, 2023, the Chancellor of the California State University shall convene a stakeholder workgroup that includes, but is not limited to, a representative from all of the following stakeholders:

(1) Faculty.

(2) Staff.

(3) Students.

(4) Campus health and safety personnel.

(5) Bargaining unit representatives.

(b) The
 stakeholder workgroup shall submit a report to the Legislature and the Chancellor of the California State University nine months after the first meeting of the stakeholder workgroup that includes recommendations to alleviate concerns of current emergency response programs on the campuses of the California State University.

(c) In preparing the report pursuant to subdivision (b), the stakeholder workgroup shall, at a minimum, evaluate and report on both of the following:

(1) Alternatives to current procedures and processes for responding to nonviolent and noncriminal situations on the campuses of the California State University.

(2) Alternative dispute resolution options to resolve employee conflicts.

(d) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 931, Sec. 2.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.  Investigation of Reported Improper Governmental Activities  [89570. - 89574.]

89570.

This article shall be known and may be referred to as the California State University Investigation of Reported Improper Governmental Activities Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

89571.

It is the intent of the Legislature that employees of, and applicants for employment at, the California State University should be free to report improper governmental activities and significant threats to health or safety and that their identities and the privacy rights of those affected by investigations of the protected disclosures be properly safeguarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

89572.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Applicant for employment” means an individual who has completed and submitted an application form for a specific, available position at a campus of the California State University or at the Office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(b) “Complainant” means an employee or applicant for employment who files a report and makes a protected disclosure in accordance with established procedures of the California State University.

(c) “Employee” means any person employed by the California State University.

(d) “Improper governmental activity” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 8547.2 of the Government Code.

(e) “Protected disclosure” means any good faith communication, as defined by subdivision (d) of Section 8547.2 of the Government Code, that is made in accordance with established procedures of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

89573.

(a) Upon receiving a protected disclosure in writing, the administrator designated in accordance with established procedures of the California State University shall acknowledge receipt of the written disclosure to the complainant. The administrator may conduct or cause to be conducted an investigative audit of the matter, and determine what action, if any, is necessary.

(b) The administrator shall issue a formal response to the complainant that contains a summary of the allegations, a summary of the investigation, whether the allegations were substantiated, and what actions, if any, were taken in response to the complaint. This response
 shall be issued in a timely fashion and in a manner that is consistent with the privacy interests of each person who is involved in the situation addressed by the response. This response shall be subject to disclosure in accordance with Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) The identity of the person providing the protected disclosure shall not be disclosed without the written permission of that person unless the disclosure is to a law enforcement agency that is conducting a criminal investigation or to the State Auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 82.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

89574.

(a) Notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, every investigative audit undertaken under this article shall be kept confidential, except that the California State University may issue any report of an investigation that has substantiated an allegation made by the complainant, keeping confidential the identity of the individual or individuals involved, or release any findings resulting from an investigation conducted pursuant to Section 89045 that the trustees deem necessary to serve the interests of the state.

(b) This article shall not be construed to limit any authority conferred by law upon
 the Attorney General or any other department or agency of government to investigate any matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 83.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Optional Retirement Program [89600. - 89623.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [89600. - 89602.]

89600.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Optional Retirement Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89601.

In order to encourage qualified teachers to enter and remain in service with the California State University, an optional retirement program is authorized by this chapter. The optional retirement program may be established on or after July 1, 1991, by a provision adopting this chapter in a memorandum of understanding which is entered into by the trustees pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, no other provision of this chapter is subject to the control of any memorandum of understanding. The optional retirement program shall become operative on the July 1 which immediately follows the receipt by the Public Employees’ Retirement System of a notice of the adoption of this chapter and a copy of the memorandum of understanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 385, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89602.

Under this optional retirement program, the trustees shall offer eligible employees contracts, certificates, or investment funds providing retirement and death benefits, funded through annuities or investment fund options. The state and eligible employees electing this optional retirement program shall contribute to the optional retirement program to the extent authorized or required by this chapter. Benefits under the contracts, certificates, or investment funds are owned by the participants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 385, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [89610. - 89614.]

89610.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89611.

“Benefit” means any monthly or lump-sum payment due a retirant, or other beneficiary, and includes lump-sum payments due on account of death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 385, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89612.

“Compensation” and “salary” have the same meaning as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 20022 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89613.

“Eligible employee” means all faculty and executive, managerial, and supervisory employees of the California State University system whose employment would qualify them for membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and who are initially appointed on or after the operative date of the optional retirement program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89614.

“Participant” means any person electing the optional retirement program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration and Participation [89620. - 89623.]

89620.

(a) Only eligible employees of the California State University may elect to participate in the optional retirement program.

(b) Elections to participate in the optional retirement program shall be made as follows:

(1) Eligible employees shall irrevocably elect either to join the Public Employees’ Retirement System in accordance with the provisions of law applicable thereto or to participate in the optional retirement program established pursuant to this chapter. This election is irrevocable and shall be made within 60 days of the date of employment. This election shall be in writing and filed with the California State University and the Public Employees’ Retirement System. Notwithstanding Section 20303 of the Government Code, eligible employees shall not be subject to membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System until either they exercise the election to not participate in the optional retirement program or the 60-day period expires, whichever occurs first, whereupon the member contributions required by Sections 20600 and 20603 of the Government Code shall commence.

(2) An election of the optional retirement program by an eligible employee shall be irrevocable and shall be accompanied by an appropriate enrollment form, where required, for the issuance of contracts or certificates under the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89621.

Any eligible employee electing to participate in the optional retirement program shall be ineligible for membership in the Public Employees’ Retirement System so long as he or she is employed in any eligible position by the California State University. In the event an optional retirement program participant assumes a position in public service for which the optional retirement program is not available, the employee shall, at that time, cease participation in the program and shall begin participation in the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

Employees who elect to participate in the optional retirement program shall remain eligible to participate in the Public Employees’ Medical and Hospital Care Act (Part 5 (commencing with Section 22750) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code) as if they were members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 69, Sec. 4.   Effective June 24, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

89622.

(a) The state shall contribute to the optional retirement program an amount equal to the employer contribution of the trustees to the Public Employees’ Retirement System, less the amount attributable to the unfunded actuarial obligation of the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund, as determined by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, which until June 30, 2016, shall instead be transmitted to the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall provide the necessary data processing services and shall charge the providers an administrative fee appropriate to pay the costs of providing those services. The amount currently attributable to the unfunded actuarial obligation of the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund has been determined by the Board of Administration to be 2 percent. The Board of Administration shall, if the employer contribution rate varies from the employer contribution rate in effect on July 1, 1991, by at least plus or minus 5 percent, recalculate the amount attributable to the unfunded actuarial obligation. Thereafter, the Board of Administration shall, whenever the employer contribution rate varies from the employer contribution rate in effect on the effective date of the previous recalculation pursuant to this section by at least plus or minus 5 percent, recalculate the amount attributable to the unfunded actuarial obligation. The trustees and the providers of optional retirement programs shall provide the Public Employees’ Retirement System with any personnel data needed for the recalculation.

(b) Participants shall contribute to the optional retirement program an amount equal to the contribution required of employees pursuant to Sections 20600 and 20603 of the Government Code.

(c) Contributions required by subdivision (b) may be made by a reduction in salary in accordance with any applicable provision of the Internal Revenue Code. Payment of contributions authorized or required by this section shall be made by the Controller to the appropriate program administrator.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund monthly to the trustees the state’s contribution prescribed in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1178, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89623.

No retirement, death, or other benefit shall be paid by the state or the trustees for services credited under the optional retirement program. The benefits are payable to participants or their beneficiaries only by the designated company or companies in accordance with the terms of the contracts, certificates, or investment funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 385, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Finance [89700. - 89775.]



  ARTICLE 1. Fees, Rents, and Charges [89700. - 89712.]

89700.

(a) The trustees may by rule require all persons to pay fees, rents, deposits, and charges for services, facilities or materials provided by the trustees to such persons. The trustees may, by rule, provide for the method of collecting such fees, rents, deposits, and charges, and may, by rule, provide for the refund in whole or part of such fees, rents, deposits, and charges collected in error or collected for facilities, services, or materials not utilized.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1165, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89700.1.

(a) Notwithstanding the requirement of Section 89301 that tuition, material, and service fees be collected by campus officials at the time of registration, the trustees, in consultation with student representatives, may authorize installment payments for the California State University fee established by the trustees pursuant to Section 89700 to cover the costs of services, facilities, or materials, and for nonresident tuition established pursuant to Section 89705. Installment payment schedules may be established in accordance with timetables as determined appropriate by the trustees, in consultation with student representatives.

(b) The trustees, in consultation with student representatives, shall impose a fee in an amount necessary to cover the costs of administering a system of installment payments and may deposit that fee in the General Fund or in local trust accounts as authorized by Section 89721 and established for the purpose of covering those costs. The administrative costs shall include, but not be limited to, the cost of collecting delinquent and defaulted accounts.

(c) The trustees shall include, in the fee imposed for administering the system of installment payments, the interest that the state would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account had the fee been collected at the time of registration. The portion of the administrative fee attributable to reimbursement for loss of interest earnings shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(d) The trustees shall provide notice of the amount of the fee that is imposed upon students who use the installment payment system. That notice shall include information regarding the amount of the fee and shall be included in the billing statement sent to the student and posted on signs at the campus cashier window. The information regarding the fee may also be conveyed to the students in any other manner determined appropriate by the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 536, Sec. 3.   Effective August 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

89701.

(a) The trustees are authorized to acquire, pursuant to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or by lease or other means, real property and to construct, operate, and maintain motor vehicle parking facilities and other transportation facilities thereon for state university officers, employees, students, or other persons. The trustees may prescribe the terms and conditions of the parking, and of parking on facilities existing on the effective date of this section, including the payment of parking fees in the amounts and under the circumstances determined by the trustees. Varying rates of parking fees may be established for different localities or for different parking facilities and for the purposes authorized by subdivision (b). In determining rates of parking fees, the trustees may consider the rates charged in the same locality by other public agencies and by private employers for employee parking, the rates charged to students by other universities and colleges.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, revenues received by the trustees from any of the motor vehicle parking facilities, as well as from all parking facilities existing on the effective date of this section, may be transmitted to the Treasurer and, if transmitted, shall be deposited by that officer in the State Treasury to the credit of the State University Parking Revenue Fund, which is hereby created.

(2) All revenues received by the trustees under this section may be pledged for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of parking and other transportation facilities, and may also be pledged to supplement other revenue funded projects relating to debt obligations issued by the trustees pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947. Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or permitting a change in the pledge of parking fee revenues established in connection with debt obligations issued prior to the enactment of this section and pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(3) All revenues received by the trustees from parking facilities, to the extent not pledged in connection with bonds or notes issued pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947, are hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the trustees for the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of motor vehicle parking facilities on real property acquired hereunder or on real property otherwise under the jurisdiction of the trustees, and for the study, development, enhancement, operation, and maintenance of alternate methods of transportation for officers, students, and employees of the California State University. 

(4) The trustees shall allocate the funds for the construction of parking facilities for each of the California State University campuses only after programs incorporating alternate methods of transportation have been thoroughly investigated and considered, as determined by the alternative transportation committees of each campus and the trustees, in consultation with students and local government officials. 

(5) Moneys in the State University Parking Revenue Fund may be invested by the Treasurer, upon approval of the trustees, in those eligible securities listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code. All interest or other earnings received pursuant to the investments shall be deposited to the credit of the State University Parking Revenue Fund.

(c) The Legislature, by this section, does not intend to authorize the institution of a private parking program unrelated to state purposes in competition with private industry.

(d) If any provision of this section is in conflict with any provision of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if one or more provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89701.5.

Moneys in the State University Parking Revenue Fund received as parking fines and forfeitures shall be used exclusively for the development, enhancement, and operation of alternate methods of transportation programs for students and employees, for the mitigation of the impact of off-campus student and employee parking in university communities, and for the administration of the parking fines and forfeitures programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1168, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

89702.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University may acquire, pursuant to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or by lease or other means, real property and may construct and improve student health centers entirely or in part by the use of funds acquired pursuant to this section.

(b) The trustees may prescribe under Section 89700 a fee to provide for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of student health center facilities, in the amounts and under the circumstances as may be determined by the trustees.

(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, revenues received by the trustees from the student health center facilities fee may be transmitted to the Treasurer and, if transmitted, shall be deposited by that officer in the State Treasury to the credit of the State University Facilities Revenue Fund, which is hereby created.

(2) All revenues received by the trustees under this section may be pledged for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of student health facilities projects pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8), and may also be pledged to supplement other revenue funded projects relating to debt obligations issued by the trustees pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947. Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or permitting a change in the pledge of student health facility fee revenues established in connection with debt obligations issued prior to the enactment of this section and pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(3) All revenues received by the trustees from the facilities fee, to the extent not pledged in connection with bonds or notes issued pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947, are hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the trustees for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of student health centers on real property acquired pursuant to this section or on real property otherwise under the jurisdiction of the trustees. 

(4) Moneys in the State University Facilities Revenue Fund may be invested by the Treasurer, upon approval of the trustees, in those eligible securities listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code. All interest or other earnings received pursuant to the investments shall be deposited to the credit of the State University Facilities Revenue Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89703.

(a) The trustees may prescribe student housing rental rates and fees to provide revenues for student housing programs in the amounts and under the circumstances that are determined by the trustees.

(b)(1) The trustees may pledge all or any part of student housing revenues in connection with bonds or notes issued pursuant to State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8), in which case the revenues shall be deposited, transmitted, and used in the manner provided by that act.

(2) All revenues received by the trustees from housing rental rates and fees under this section may be pledged for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of student housing projects, and may also be pledged to supplement other revenue funded projects relating to debt obligations issued by the trustees pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947. Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or permitting a change in the pledge of housing rental revenues established in connection with debt obligations issued prior to the enactment of this section and pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 285, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89704.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, revenues received by the Trustees of the California State University from extension programs, special session, or self-supporting instructional programs, including, but not limited to, fees and charges required by the trustees, may be transmitted to either of the following:

(1) The Treasurer and, if transmitted, shall be deposited by that officer in the State Treasury to the credit of the State University Continuing Education Revenue
 Fund, which is hereby created, and which is hereby designated as successor to the State College Extension Program Revenue Fund.

(2) The chief fiscal officer of one or more campuses of the California State University, and, if transmitted, shall be deposited by the chief fiscal officer in accordance with Section 89721.

(b) All revenues in the State University Continuing Education Revenue Fund are hereby appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the trustees for the support and development of
 instructional programs of the California State University. However, proposed expenditures or obligations to be incurred during any fiscal year from the State University Continuing Education Revenue Fund, other than expenditures or obligations authorized by subdivision (d), shall be contained in the budget submitted for that fiscal year by the Governor pursuant to Section 12 of Article IV of the Constitution, and shall be subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 13320) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.
